District of Columbia statutes.
29-1205.03

Action by trustees.

On any matter that is to be acted on by trustees, the following rules apply:

(1)

The trustees shall act by majority of the trustees.

(2)

The trustees may act without a meeting, without previous notice, and without a vote, if the minimum number of trustees necessary to authorize or take the action at a meeting at which all trustees entitled to vote thereon were present and voted consent in a signed record. However, prompt notice of the action shall be given to those trustees that did not consent.

(3)

A trustee may vote in person or by proxy, but, if by proxy, the proxy shall be in a signed record.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 503 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Editor's Notes